Idaho, session 2025, S1164.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 41, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4117, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4117. PROCESSING BUILDING PERMITS -- TIMELY REVIEW. (1) A local
government that requires building permits shall make available a document
that describes in detail the requirements of its building permit process.
The local government shall provide the document to the public on its website
and in physical form upon request.
(2) An applicant for a building permit shall make a good faith effort to
submit a complete application containing the necessary documentation re-
quired by a local government as specified in the document required pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section. If an application is deemed incomplete,
the local government shall, within ten (10) business days of receipt of a
residential building permit application and within twenty (20) business
days of receipt of a commercial building permit application, provide writ-
ten notice to the applicant specifying any missing information necessary to
proceed.
(3) Upon receipt of a submission or a revised submission following an
incomplete determination, a local government shall have ten (10) business
days for a residential building permit and twenty (20) business days for a
commercial building permit to review the application or the revised submis-
sion for completeness. No later than the conclusion of the applicable ten
(10) or twenty (20) business day review period, the local government shall
provide written notice of determination on the completeness of the appli-
cation. A local government's determination that an application is complete
shall not constitute approval but shall authorize the application to proceed
to formal plan review.
(4) An applicant and a local government may agree in writing to an ex-
tension of the timelines specified in this section if additional time is
needed for the completeness determination. Prior to any such agreement, a
local government shall provide written notice to an applicant explaining
that an extension is needed.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.